test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h25_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: merki
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: merki
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: merki
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: merkis
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [merki, merkir]
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [merki, merkir]
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: merkjum
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: merkja
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: merkið
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: merkið
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: merkinum
    merki+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: merkisins
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: merkini
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: merkini
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: merkjunum
    merki+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: merkjanna
